North Carolina statutes. Chapter 65. Cemeteries.
Article 10. Access to and Maintenance of Private Graves and Abandoned Public Cemeteries. [Repealed]

§§ 65-74,
65-75.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2007-118, s. 6, effective July 1, 2007, and applicable to all trusts created on or after that date.

Cross References.

For similar present provisions, see

G.S. 65-101

, 65-102.

§ 65-76.

Reserved for future codification purposes.